Tennessee, session 114, SB2331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-2-107, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(2)(B).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-56-107, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
(a)
(1) The following contracts and contract amendments shall be subject to
review by the fiscal review committee of the general assembly:
(A) Proposed noncompetitive contracts with a maximum liability of
not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), as projected
through the maximum term of the contract, including consideration of all
provided extensions and renewals, regardless of whether the maximum
liability for the original base term is below that amount; and
(B) Any amendment to a contract that meets or, as amended,
would meet the dollar threshold in subdivision (a)(1)(A), regardless of
whether the original contract was procured through competitive or
noncompetitive means, that:
(i) Increases or decreases the maximum liability;
(ii) Extends or shortens the contract term;
SB2331
012125
- 1 -

(iii) Changes the contracting entity or name of the
contracting entity; or
(iv) Otherwise alters the original contract or a prior
amendment, including, but not limited to, changes to scope,
deliverables, pricing methodology, or performance requirements.
(2) For purposes of this section, "noncompetitive contract":
(A) Means any procurement arrangement for goods or services
entered into by, or on behalf of, a procuring agency without a competitive
solicitation having been formally conducted by the procuring agency or by
the chief procurement officer, regardless of whether the arrangement is
designated as a contract, grant, agreement, amendment, or other
procurement vehicle; and
(B) Includes any arrangement that binds the agency to the terms
of an agreement that was competitively procured by another state or
governmental entity of another state.
(b)
(1) Contracts subject to review include, but are not limited to, all
contracts of the executive branch that otherwise meet the requirements of
subdivision (a)(1), including, but not limited to, contracts of higher education,
including the board of regents, the University of Tennessee, all other land grant
institutions, and the Tennessee higher education commission.
(2) Contracts not subject to review include:
(A) Contracts awarded to a public institution of higher education
to procure research or goods or services that are intended to result in an
unambiguous and direct benefit to the public;
- 2 - 012125

(B) Contracts awarded to a governmental entity, including, but not
limited to, a local government;
(C) Highway and road improvement contracts reviewed by the
department of transportation;
(D) Contracts reviewed by the state building commission; and
(E) Debt issuance contracts reviewed by the comptroller of the
treasury.
(3) If the chief procurement officer or procuring agency is unable to
determine whether a proposed contract or contract amendment is subject to
review by the fiscal review committee, the chief procurement officer or procuring
agency shall contact the fiscal review committee staff for a determination.
(4) In addition to the contracts subject to mandatory review under this
section, the fiscal review committee, pursuant to its jurisdiction in § 3-7-103(a),
and upon the committee providing a formal request to the procuring agency, is
authorized to review any other state contract or contract amendment entered into
by any branch of state government in accordance with the procedures
established in this section, without regard to whether the contract or contract
amendment otherwise meets the requirements or the exemptions established in
subsections (a) or (b).
(c) If review is required pursuant to subsection (a), or upon a determination by
the fiscal review committee pursuant to subdivision (b)(4), the procuring agency shall
contemporaneously file a request with the fiscal review committee, the comptroller of the
treasury, and the chief procurement officer, if the contract is otherwise subject to such
entity's oversight. The request submitted to the fiscal review committee must include the
following:
- 3 - 012125

(1) Description of the goods or services to be acquired;
(2) Explanation of the need for or requirement to acquire the goods or
services;
(3) Name and address of the proposed contractor's principal owner;
(4) Evidence that the proposed contractor has experience in providing
the same or similar goods or services and evidence of the length of time the
contractor has provided the same or similar goods or services;
(5) Explanation of whether the goods or services were purchased by the
procuring agency in the past and, if applicable, the method used to purchase the
goods or services and the name and address of the contractor;
(6) Description of the procuring agency's efforts to use existing state
employees and resources or, in the alternative, to identify reasonable and
competitive procurement alternatives, rather than to use noncompetitive
negotiation;
(7) Justification of why the goods or services should be acquired through
noncompetitive negotiation; and
(8) Any additional information that the fiscal review committee may direct
the procuring agency to provide that will assist the committee in evaluating the
contract.
(d)
(1) All contracts and amendments subject to review pursuant to
subdivision (a) must be submitted to the fiscal review committee by no later than
sixty (60) calendar days prior to the contract's or amendment's proposed
effective date. The fiscal review committee has sixty (60) calendar days from
receipt of a request filed pursuant to this section to comment on a proposed
- 4 - 012125

contract or contract amendment. Upon expiration of this review period, unless
the review period has been extended pursuant to subdivision (d)(3), any such
contract or amendment authorized by the chief procurement officer may be
executed.
(2) The chair of the fiscal review committee, or the chair's designee, may
waive the sixty-day review period and authorize the chief procurement officer to
execute a contract or contract amendment determined to be in the best interest
of the state, with reporting to and comment by the committee at its next
scheduled meeting, if such reporting is required by the chair.
(3) The chair of the fiscal review committee, or the chair's designee, may
extend the sixty-day review period in extenuating circumstances if, upon
consultation with the chief procurement officer and the procuring agency, as
applicable, the chair or designee determines that the extension would not
materially delay the timely procurement of the goods or services.
(e)
(1) No later than the fifth business day of each calendar month, the chief
procurement officer shall report to the fiscal review committee the following
information for the prior calendar month:
(A) An itemized listing of all contracts, grants, or any other
procurement arrangements that were awarded during the prior month,
competitive and noncompetitive; and
(B) Any policy, procedure, or rule change to the state
procurement processes planned for the following month.
(2) The report required pursuant to subdivision (e)(1) must include the
name of the department or agency for which the procurement is made, contract
- 5 - 012125

number, description of the goods or services procured, contractor name, contract
period, contract amount, procurement method, and any additional information
that the fiscal review committee requests the chief procurement officer to provide
or that the chief procurement officer elects to include.
(3) Each procuring agency granted a special delegated authority,
pursuant to rules authorized by § 4-56-105, to establish goods and services
contracts shall report to the fiscal review committee a list of all contracts awarded
under the delegated authority. The list of contracts awarded must be filed
quarterly and must include the description of the goods or services procured,
contractor name, contract period, contract amount, procurement method,
completion date for a monitoring review, and any additional information that the
fiscal review committee requests the procuring agency to provide or that the
procuring agency elects to include.
(4) The department of transportation and the state building commission
shall each report to the fiscal review committee, within thirty (30) days of
approval, contracts approved by the respective entity that were exempt from
committee review pursuant to subdivisions (b)(2)(C) and (D) and that otherwise
meet the requirements of subdivision (a)(1). The report must include a
description of the goods or services procured, contractor name, contract period,
contract amount, procurement method, and any additional information that the
committee requests the department or commission to provide or that the
department or commission elects to include.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 6 - 012125